Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.820

Times for filing challenges—Hearings—Treatment of challenged ballots.

(1) Challenges must be filed with the county auditor of the county in which the challenged voter is registered no later than 45 days before the election. The county auditor presides over the hearing.

(2) Challenges may be filed after 45 days before the election, only when the challenged voter registered to vote less than 60 days before the election, or changed residence less than 60 days before the election without updating the residence address of the voter's voter registration. A challenge may then be filed not later than 10 days before any primary or election, general or special, or within 10 days of the voter being added to the voter registration database, whichever is later.

(a) If the challenge is filed after 45 days before an election at which the challenged voter is eligible to vote, a notation of the challenge must be made immediately to the challenged voter's registration in the voter registration system, and the county canvassing board shall preside over the hearing.

(b) If the challenge is filed before the challenged voter's ballot is received, the ballot must be processed as a challenged ballot, and held until the challenge is resolved.

(c) If the challenge is filed after the challenged voter's ballot is received, the challenge cannot affect the current election. However, the process shall proceed until the challenge is resolved.

[ 2023 c 466 s 29; 2013 c 11 s 20; 2011 c 10 s 21; 2006 c 320 s 5; 2003 c 111 s 254; 1987 c 288 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 30 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.10.127.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Right to vote

loss of: State Constitution Art. 6 s 3.

restoration of: RCW 9.92.066, 9.94A.637, 9.94A.885, 9.95.260, chapter 9.96 RCW.